Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2174
Answer; contents.

The answers of the defendants must state, among other things, the amount and nature of their respective interests. They may deny the interest of any of the plaintiffs, and by supplemental pleading, if necessary, may deny the interests of any of the other defendants.

R.S.1867, Code § 806, p. 538;

R.S.1913, § 8289;

C.S.1922, § 9242;

C.S.1929, § 20-2174;

R.S.1943, § 25-2174.

Where plaintiff bases action on legal title, defendant may set up in answer equitable defense thereto. Lynch v. Lynch, 18 Neb. 586, 26 N.W. 390 (1886).